dict/fj_FJ.dic
baca/qrx
balekoso/9
bali/t
balu/ar
basika/w
basu/gjtJk
bati/q6cjvE
bau/zYw
bawa/s5
be/aszjqw5bg
bele/jzq
beresi/x
bese/kyrx
bete/qg
beti/tkx
bili/kyuxtJe
biri/gjz
bobo/ltJgkuw
bobobo/lFu
bogi/kd98x
boiri/v
boro/Jk5
boseka/s
boso/gtr
bosoboso/Hu
bubu/bsauw
bukebuke/r
bukisoleniuto/x
buku/zw5
bunu/5
buraci/p
buradela/q
butubula/xy
butusiri/w
ca/AsEK
cabacaba/sr
cabe/zxt
cabo/gsv
caca/8
cagola/5
calocalo/6
cama/q
canu/m9p
caqeinadaku/x
cara/no
cau/tx
cave/q
cavucavu/Fu
cavuya/t9as
cebegudu/9
cebu/u5
cegu/8S9
ceka/tw
cere/6
ceru/mp
ceuceu/uEFl
ciba/z
cibi/rF
cicici/F7
cigi/kwzt
cike/9
cila/96
cina/6r9
ciqi/sno
ciqiciqi/Fo
civi/w
coba/st
cobo/s
coco/oq
cokocoko/z
cole/8
coqa/twJ
coqadro/xy
cori/z8w
cuki/wJt
cukicuki/uF
cumu/uwtJ
cuqucuqu/Fu
curu/m5jp8nx
curusese/w
cuva/Ys
daba/gq
dabadaba/r
dabera/j6
dabu/5
dada/s
dai/rav
daliga/Yq
dama/q
danu/nom5
dara/oE
davo/tv
davokoso/9
de/gq
dela/q
di/9qf6v
didi/8
dike/96
dina/wyz
diva/r
do/gsj6
doka/q
dola/k9jJ
dolo/kg89
domoqa/wx
dou/8
draiva/xy
drasi/9
drauniulu/q
dravusa/qr
dredre/76S8
drewe/w
dro/xeyg8
drusa/9
duata/r
dulu/g8p
duru/qg
durumu/v
dusi/8n
ece/96
eke/gv5
ema/v
fika/x
gaga/Xw
galu/869
gole/9
gona/v
gude/t
ibe/qw
ibukubuku/z
ibutubutu/l7yju
icabecabe/uyz
icabocabo/v
icaqecaqe/z
icavucavu/z
iciqociqo/p
ico/6ver
icoco/o6
icodocodo/o
icovicovi/u
icudrucudru/76
icurucuru/7y
idaradara/6op
idi/6vr
idididi/7
idoi/r
idrodro/7y
igutugutu/l6
ikarakara/7y
ikasakasa/u
ikasi/6
ikasivi/z
ikidikidi/6
ikilukilu/7
ikisokiso/76y
ikivikivi/lz
ikocokoco/6
ikolokolo/y6l
ikotokoto/v
ikou/6
ikoukou/7
ikudrukudru/7y
ikukurau/z
ikulikuli/u
ila/9e
ilabalaba/z
iladelade/7
iladeladetubu/y
ilavelave/z
ilo/9jm6
ilobilobi/u
ilokiloki/r
ilualua/u
ilubaluba/z
imimi/p
imoqemoqe/uz
inimanima/z
inokanoka/zvy
inokinoki/lu
inukinuki/lu
inununu/7y
io/vr9w6
ioboobo/z
iodroodro/6
iokooko/z7
iosiosi/67
iqa/69
iqaloqalo/y76
iqasiqasi/7
iqi/9
iqoliqoli/6
iqoqolou/7
iquruquru/z
iraborabo/yjz
iri/986
iroiroi/y
iroqo/z
isasa/o
isemasema/z
isevu/r
isikisiki/z
isilisili/p
isirosiro/7y
isiwasiwa/z6
isobesobe/z
isobusobu/v
isole/3
isoso/p
isososo/of
isovasova/v
isu/W1r
isua/s
isucusucu/p
isulusulu/yop
ita/eu6vwl9
itagataga/y6r
itakataka/6
italetale/6
itaqataqa/v
itaratarakadru/6z
itasitasi/lv
itatakoso/6
itatavo/u
itatavoi/y
itau/eu
itautau/vb
itavotavo/bu
itekiteki/7rlu
iti/jv
itikotiko/v
itilotilo/p
itinitini/o
itoka/r
itokatoka/v
itonitonisua/y
itoqitoqi/r
itubetube/v
ituruturu/p6
ituvatuva/r
iuso/v
iutuutu/uv
iuu/7y
ivakamate/r
ivakauu/y7
ivakavakayadra/z
ivava/b9j6
ivavaki/y
ividi/q
ivuruvuru/jp
ivuruvurumi/y
iwaruwaru/zj
iyabeyabe/r
iyadrayadra/7
iyaliyali/u
iyamoyamo/bu
iyaqayaqa/y67
iyauyau/zy
jata/rx
jisili/x
kabi/w
kabu/u5
kabukabu/u
kaci/786
kacikaci/F7
kada/7
kadi/evq
kadru/k9Jm6w
kaila/8
kaisi/vS
kaka/wq
kalikali/Fu
kanayaku/w
kaniyate/q
kanusi/x
karasi/qe9r
karisi/erq
kasa/tp
kasami/yx
kase/ksw
kasi/ut
katari/9
katoni/p
katukatu/p
kauwai/yx
kava/gs
kavakava/rF
ke/qc65g
keleravi/w
keli/u8t7
kelikeli/F7u
keliruku/wz
kena/9
kerubi/pr
ki/kw6x9scjqy
kibo/u
kida/98a
kidroa/Xx
kike/vg5
kili/9zqaw
kirukirua/r
kiso/98x4
koco/96
kodro/w986
koi/s
koko/u5z
kola/kw9
kolailima/x
kolalima/x
koli/z
kolo/kryJ9x
koma/r
konitaraki/xy
kopa/sz
kosi/xz
kosociwa/x
kosovitu/x
koti/k9JS
kudru/98x6
kui/wxy
kuju/v
kulakula/zw
kunekune/xy
kura/gjw
kuru/97w
kusi/zm
kuta/gv
kutu/v
kuvui/x
lade/89
ladekoso/9
lago/rF
lakobale/w
lasaga/9
laveliga/yx
leca/96
lecaiyalo/q
lei/s
leibai/x
leira/w
lele/a58g
lelevu/yx
lepa/z
lesa/69
leve/r
lewe/Yq
liga/aq
ligadua/xy
lito/n
livi/tu
liwa/96
lobo/ts
lobolobo/Fu
lokamu/xy
lolosi/x8
loma/rqa
lomaloma/ar
lota/v
lua/atbu
luba/kzw
lule/8x
mada/s
mai/jr
maja/v
maka/xnEy
makubu/q
maqosa/xy
marau/yx
masikura/z
masimasi/Fru
masu/wlkz
me/2aq
mimi/ar
minisi/w
misa/s
moce/YsS
moko/wkz
mokosa/v
molo/6
moqe/wuxt
mota/xy
mulomulo/urF
murikoso/9
murimuri/Fy
muriseva/w
musuono/x
nadaku/5Y
namu/wzt
nana/9o
nani/kuJt
nau/wrE
nini/9ar8
nino/9
no/gazjlw
noka/qks
nuki/kt
nuku/5
nunu/E98xL6
nunukoso/9
nunuyadra/x
oi/s
oko/w578
ole/9z8
oqo/gv9
osi/986
oso/Yw9
ova/rxa
pa/Gs
paraima/v
parofisai/x
pate/qw
pau/wr
pele/zr
piki/r
poidi/yx
poro/5
qaco/5
qai/98
qali/rwq
qaliqali/qar
qalo/8gy6rx9
qami/wq
qanu/5
qaqa/Xs
qase/zw
qaseti/x
qasi/tw7g689
qasiqasi/u
qata/96
qati/g4m
qau/v
qava/twu
qavu/q
qele/rq
qere/w6
qeti/6
qila/zw
qili/atJ
qiliqili/Fu
qiliwaci/q
qiso/ts
qoli/6E9
qolou/8
qoro/5
quaqua/Fu
ququ/qa
quwa/w
ra/Dmn96
railevu/yx
raiseva/w
raravu/5
rarawa/xySE
rasi/kx
reka/Ow
reva/v
rewai/s
rika/a9wx
risi/z
riteli/x
riviu/yx
rogo/bpa7
rogoseva/w
roiroi/7F
roko/96
rubu/qzw
sa/Yem9
saisai/Js
saka/6
salava/w
samani/yx
sara/nro
sarasara/Fo
sasai/sv
sausau/Fp
sawa/q
sebe/s
seke/wr
sekeni/v
sele/Jwkz9
semina/v
sena/wz
seni/4zw
sere/qgky7jx9l8
seva/gsyj
sevara/s
sevu/gsrx5
sigasiga/r
siki/pswkt
siko/96zr
siloko/x
sinusinu/p
siri/9wz
siro/6x98
sisibulu/w
sobu/Ys
sodo/mn
sodosodo/Fo
sokobale/zw
sokovoli/w
sole/e87
solevu/xwyz
soligusu/yx
soliinadaku/x
solikesu/q
solo/xtw
solosolo/Fu
soro/897S
sovasova/FrHu
sovi/6
sovu/ktw
sua/sxgkJr
sugu/Jlktw
sui/zJk6q
suli/q
sulu/gpmnx
sulumabu/xy
suru/w5z
taba/k9qg
tacenu/n
tai/g9jmp
taimi/x
taki/8yr
talatala/ue
tale/6S8e
tama/wdqg
tamu/5
taqa/5
taqakoso/9
taqaya/8x
tarau/s
tasiduri/x
tata/Fs76
tatawai/y
tautauri/8
tavaya/5
tavitavi/Fu
tavo/u5bt
tavucorocoro/x
tawa/rWYq
tawanitaga/xy
tayalo/x
tegu/6a9
tei/Es87
teke/5J
teki/ktql
tekibuku/q
tevu/gt
tiki/akz9vxq
tiko/esr
tiloqa/xw
tina/Yr
tini/na
tinia/9
tobu/t
todrou/9m
togo/5kt
togotogo/u
tokalulu/x
toko/qar
toma/rwq
tomo/kt
toqa/skJ
toro/95S6
toso/5
totoyawalu/x
tu/jqx65get9Es
tube/stv
tuga/rqc
tuku/Fr
tutu/F6
tutuvi/xy
ucuucukalavo/xy
uku/ywx
ukuuku/Fz
uliuli/Fu
uso/gtvs
usousonidomo/q
usu/okwtn
vaga/qr
vagata/s
vagogo/xy
vagugu/8x
vaisoni/x
vakabi/sgx
vakabukabuka/q
vakabula/xy
vakacabe/v
vakacava/s
vakacegu/5
vakaciba/sv
vakacokocoko/w
vakacorocoro/5
vakadarodaro/5
vakadravudravua/xy
vakadromu/a5
vakaduka/s
vakaipure/xy
vakaisulu/x
vakaiyau/xy
vakalecaleca/9
vakalekaleka/xy
vakalevu/5gxy
vakalevulevu/5
vakaloru/5
vakama/qw
vakamadua/y
vakamana/x
vakamenemene/x
vakamucu/5
vakamumu/v
vakanuinuica/y
vakao/e9sz
vakarau/yx
vakarogo/x5
vakaruru/5e
vakasa/6
vakasamaca/xy
vakasau/xvy
vakasausau/aqxr
vakasika/w
vakasoro/5
vakasosa/yx
vakasovasova/s
vakasucu/pxm
vakatabu/5
vakataka/sw
vakatama/w
vakatariri/v
vakatasisi/vx
vakatasuasua/x
vakataubale/y
vakatavutavu/xq
vakatosotoso/5
vakatoto/xp
vakatukutuku/qax
vakau/s
vakaudu/5
vakaukaua/xy
vakausausa/q
vakavuku/5
vakavuvu/5y
vakawaigaga/x
vakawaitanutanu/yx
vakayalocudrucudru/xy
vakayalokatakata/yx
vakayaloririko/yx
vakayatuyatu/x
vakayavu/5
vaki/H7x
vako/Jks
vakotikoti/9
vakubu/xz
vaqase/rq
vaqiqi/xv
vaqumuqumu/w
vavakumu/r
vei/s8gw3
veiba/x3y
veibari/4
veibili/y4
veibiu/4
veibo/fE4
veibobo/E43
veiboi/b34
veibulu/4
veicai/3
veicaqe/43
veicebe/4
veicigi/lu3
veico/4v3
veicovi/4
veicumu/4
veidre/z43
veidusi/o43
veika/3q4z
veikadru/4l
veikana/34
veikati/4l3
veikau/4
veikini/4
veikivi/l34
veikoba/34
veikona/y3
veikove/4
veilali/4x3
veilari/3
veilave/4z
veilesi/43
veileti/4x3
veiluba/34
veimama/x4
veimodro/l4
veimoko/34l
veimoku/4l
veimuri/43
veipasi/34
veiqeu/4
veiqisa/4
veirabo/jy4z
veiroba/4l3
veirokorokovi/yx
veiroqo/z4
veisa/x7y
veisaba/4l
veisabi/x34
veisako/4l
veisaqa/4z
veisau/xoy4
veisele/4E
veisole/7
veisoli/4
veisua/43
veisui/4
veita/wl74
veitaba/Er43
veitala/34
veitara/46
veitaratara/6
veitau/4xu
veitavi/4
veitebe/y43
veitene/4
veitiko/3
veitoki/3y4l
veitono/4lj3
veitoro/43
veitui/u4
veitukuni/3x4
veiula/j4y
veiveka/34
veividi/34
veiviri/j4l3
veivoli/4E
veivosaki/yx
veiwaki/4x
veiwere/43
veiyaki/4lu
veiyalayala/z
veiyamo/Eu34
vesuvesu/Ful
vinaka/zw
viriviri/ylF
vivi/6tae
voci/LktJ
vocivoci/lu
vodi/q
voki/6
vora/w
vore/z
vosaimata/x
vosavinaka/xy
vudoloi/9
vukumu/r
vulagi/wyax
vunibati/q
vuso/Y5
wabibi/v
wadra/c8
wakiwaki/ulw
waliwali/u
wari/yx4v
waseyatini/x
wavoki/wzx
weniyava/q
wi/Av
yadra/7a8
yadradonu/5
yadre/qc
yago/a5q
yaka/64
yaki/FJ3
yakiyaki/luF
yalayala/bur
yali/at
yaqa/89x
yauyau/Fu
yavairua/xy
yavayava/q
yavoki/wx
